Utah statutes.
73-18c-308.   Providing false evidence of owner's or operator's security -- Penalty.

(1)  A person who provides evidence of owner's or operator's security to a peace officer under Section 73-18-13.5 or 73-18c-304 knowing or having reason to believe that the evidence of owner's or operator's security is false or that it is evidence of owner's or operator's security that is not in effect is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(2)  A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the person:

(a)  forges or, without authority, signs any evidence of proof of owner's or operator's security; or

(b)  falsely swears or affirms when obtaining a registration under Section 73-18c-303.

